Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202021-325.02
Foreign corporation authority to transact business; reinstatement
denied; appeal.

(1) If the Secretary of State denies a foreign
corporation's application for reinstatement following administrative revocation of its certificate
of authority under section 21-325, he or she shall serve the foreign corporation
under section 21-2,212 with a written notice
that explains the reason or reasons for denial.

(2) The foreign corporation may appeal the denial of reinstatement to
the district court of Lancaster County within thirty days after service of
the notice of denial is perfected under section 21-2,212. The
foreign corporation shall appeal by petitioning the court to set aside the
revocation and attaching to the petition copies of the Secretary of State's
certificate of revocation, the foreign corporation's application for reinstatement,
and the Secretary of State's notice of denial.

(3) The court may summarily order the Secretary of State to reinstate
the certificate of authority or may take any other action the court considers
appropriate.

(4) The court's final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

Laws 1996, LB 1036, § 3;

Laws 2014, LB749, § 258.